Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.231

Territory subject to annexation proposal—When annexation by another city or incorporation allowed.

After a petition proposing an annexation by a code city has been filed with the city or the city legislative authority, or after a resolution proposing the annexation by a code city has been adopted by the city legislative authority, no territory included in the proposed annexation may be annexed by another city or town or incorporated into a city or town unless: (1) The boundary review board or county annexation review board created under RCW 35A.14.160 modifies the boundaries of the proposed annexation and removes the territory; (2) the boundary review board or county annexation review board created under RCW 35A.14.160 rejects the proposed annexation; or (3) the city legislative authority rejects the proposed annexation or voters defeat the ballot proposition authorizing the annexation.

[ 1994 c 216 s 8.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 216: See note following RCW 35.02.015.